Utah statutes.
20A-4-406.   Election contests -- Appeal.
(1) (a)  Either party may appeal the district court's judgment to the Supreme
Court as in other cases of appeal from the district court.
(b)  When an appeal is taken, the district court may not stay execution or
proceedings, except execution for costs.
(2)  Whenever an election is annulled or set aside by the judgment of a court
and no appeal is taken within 10 days, the certificate of election, if any has
been issued, is void, and the office is vacant.
